nb: Kitesurfing-stil: Big air-kitesurfing; Kiting med foil; Freeride kitesurfing; Freestyle kitesurfing; Snøkiting; Kitesurfeløp; Bølgeridning; Annet
nl: Kitesurfstijl: Kitesurfen in de lucht; Kitefoilen; Freeride kitesurfen; Freestyle kitesurfen; Kitesurfen; Kitesurfen op snelheid; Golfsurfen; Andere
ko: 카이트서핑 스타일: 빅에어 카이트서핑; 포일링 카이트서핑; 프리라이드 카이트서핑; 프리스타일 카이트서핑; 스노우 카이트서핑; 스피드 카이트서핑; 파도타기; 기타
tr: Uçurtma sörfü stili: Büyük hava rüzgar sörfü; Foiling rüzgar sörfü; Serbest rüzgar sörfü; Serbest stil rüzgar sörfü; Karda rüzgar sörfü; Hızlı rüzgar sörfü; Dalga sörfü; Diğer
fi: Leijalautailun tyyli: Ilmaleijalautailu; Folioleijalautailu; Freeride kitesurfing; Freestyle kitesurfing; Lumileijalautailu; Pikaleijalautailu; Waveriding; Muu
de: Kitesurfing-Stil: Big-Air-Kitesurfen; Kitefoiling; Freeride-Kitesurfen; Freestyle-Kitesurfen; Kitesurfen im Schnee; Speed-Kitesurfen; Wellenreiten; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 風箏衝浪風格: 風箏衝浪; 風翼衝浪; 自由式風箏衝浪; 自由式風箏衝浪; 風箏滑雪; 競速風箏衝浪; 衝浪; 其他
ro-RO: Stil kitesurfing: Big air kitesurfing; Foiling kitesurfing; Freeride kitesurfing; Freestyle kitesurfing; Snow kitesurfing; Viteza kitesurfing; Wave riding; Altele
hu: Sárkányszörfözés stílusa: Nagy légi sárkányszörfözés; Foiling sárkányszörfözés; Freeride sárkányszörfözés; Freestyle sárkányszörfözés; Snow sárkányszörfözés; Speed sárkányszörfözés; Hullámlovaglás; Egyéb
th: สไตล์สำหรับไคท์เซิร์ฟ: ไคท์เซิร์ฟประเภทลอยสูงและนาน; ไคท์เซิร์ฟแบบใช้ไฮโดรฟอยล์; ไคท์เซิร์ฟฟรีไรด์; ไคท์เซิร์ฟฟรีสไตล์; ไคท์เซิร์ฟบนหิมะ; ไคท์เซิร์ฟแข่งความเร็ว; กิจกรรมบนผิวน้ำ; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại lướt ván diều: Lướt ván diều lớn trên không; Lướt ván diều; Lướt ván diều tự do; Lướt ván diều đa dạng; Lướt ván diều trên tuyết; Lướt ván diều tốc độ; Cưỡi sóng; Khác
zh-CN: 风筝冲浪款式: 大空中风筝冲浪; 水翼风筝冲浪; 自由风筝冲浪; 自由式风筝冲浪; 雪地风筝冲浪; 速度风筝冲浪; 冲浪; 其他
hr-HR: Stil kitesurfinga: Big air kitesurfing; Kitesurfing na moru; Kitesurfing izvan uređenih područja; Kitesurfing slobodnog stila; Kitesurfing na snijegu; Brzi kitesurfing; Jahanje na valovima; Ostalo
bg-BG: Стил на кайтсърфинг: Въздушен кайтсърфинг; Фойлинг кайтсърфинг; Фрийрайд кайтсърфинг; Фрийстайл кайтсърфинг; Снежен кайтсърфинг; Скоростен кайтсърфинг; Езда на вълни; Други
pt-PT: Estilo kitesurf: Kitesurf aéreo; Kitesurf com hidrofólio; Kitesurf freeride; Kitesurf freestyle; Kitesurf na neve; Kitesurf em velocidade; Surf; Outro
pl: Styl kitesurfingu: Kitesurfing Big air; Kitesurfing z folią; Kitesurfing freeride; Kitesurfing dowolny; Kitesurfing na śniegu; Kitesurfing szybki; Jazda na fali; Inne
it: Stile del kitesurf: Kitesurf big air; Kitesurf di tipo foiling; Kitesurf freeride; Kitesurf freestyle; Kitesurf sulla neve; Kitesurf in velocità; Wave riding; Altro
sv: Kitesurfingstil: Big air kitesurfing; Foiling kitesurfing; Freeride kitesurfing; Freestyle-kitesurfing; Snowkitesurfning; Snowkitesurfning; Vågridning; Övrigt
pt-BR: Estilo de kitesurf: Kitesurf big air; Kite foil; Kitesurf freeride; Kitesurf freestyle; Kitesurf na neve; Kitesurf de velocidade; Wave riding; Outro
da: Kitesurfingstil: Kitesurfing; Kitesurfing – foiling; Freeride kitesurfing; Freestyle kitesurfing; Snekitesurfing; Speed-kitesurfing; Bølgeridning; Andet
sl-SI: Slog kajtanja: Kajtanje v močnem vetru; Kajtanje s hidrogliserji; Freeride kajtanje; Kajtanje v prostem slogu; Snežno kajtanje; Hitrostno kajtanje; Jahanje valov; Drugo
en: Kitesurfing style: Big air kitesurfing; Foiling kitesurfing; Freeride kitesurfing; Freestyle kitesurfing; Snow kitesurfing; Speed kitesurfing; Wave riding; Other
sk-SK: Štýl kitesurfingu: Big air kitesurfing; Foiling kitesurfing; Freeride kitesurfing; Freestyle kitesurfing; Snow kitesurfing; Speed kitesurfing; Jazda na vlnách; Iné
fr: Style de kitesurf: Kitesurf big air; Kitesurf en foil; Kitesurf freeride; Kitesurf freestyle; Kitesurf sur neige; Kitesurf de vitesse; Surf sur les vagues; Autre
lt-LT: Jėgos aitvarų sporto stilius: Didelių jėgos aitvarų sportas; Jėgos aitvarai su povandeniniais sparnais; Mėgėjiški jėgos aitvarai; Laisvo stiliaus jėgos aitvarai; Sniego jėgos aitvarai; Greičio jėgos aitvarai; Plaukiojimas bangomis; Kita
ru: Направление кайтсерфинга: Биг-эйр кайтсерфинг; Фойл-кайтсерфинг; Фрирайд кайтсерфинг; Фристайл кайтсерфинг; Снежный кайтсерфинг; Скоростной кайтсерфинг; Катание на волнах; Другое
es: Estilo de kitesurf: Kitesurf de gran altura; Kitesurf con hydrofoil; Kitesurf estilo libre; Kitesurf estilo libre; Kitesurf de nieve; Kitesurf de velocidad; Montar olas; Otros
el: Στυλ kitesurfing: Big air kitesurfing; Foiling kitesurfing; Freeride kitesurfing; Freestyle kitesurfing; Snow kitesurfing; Speed kitesurfing; Wave riding; Άλλο
cs: Styl kitesurfingu: Big air kitesurfing; Foiling kitesurfing; Freeridový kitesurfing; Freestylový kitesurfing; Kitesurfing na sněhu; Rychlostní kitesurfing; Jízda na vlnách; Jiné
ja: カイトサーフィンのスタイル: ビッグエアカイトサーフィン; フォイルカイトサーフィン; フリーライドカイトサーフィン; フリースタイルカイトサーフィン; スノーカイトサーフィン; スピードカイトサーフィン; 波乗り; その他